Illinois, session 104th, SB333.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Biometric Information Privacy Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 14/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Biometric Information Privacy Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-994, eff. 10-3-08.)